Washington statutes.
RCW 15.86.010

Purpose.

The legislature recognizes a public benefit in:

(1) Establishing standards governing the labeling and advertising of agricultural products and commodities as organic products or transitional products;

(2) Providing certification under the national organic program for agricultural products marketed and labeled using the term "organic" or a derivative of the term "organic;"

(3) Providing access for Washington producers, processors, and handlers to domestic and international markets for organic products;

(4) Establishing a state organic program or obtaining federal accreditation as a certifying agent under the national organic program; and

(5) Establishing a brand name materials list for registration of inputs that comply with national, international, or other organic standards.

[ 2010 c 109 s 1; 2002 c 220 s 1; 1992 c 71 s 1; 1985 c 247 s 1.]